Utah statutes.
79-4-204.   Division authorized to enter into contracts and agreements.

(1)  The division, with the approval of the executive director and the governor, may enter into contracts and agreements with the United States, a United States agency, any other department or agency of the state, semipublic organizations, and with private individuals to:

(a)  improve and maintain state parks and recreational grounds and the areas administered by the division; and

(b)  secure labor, quarters, materials, services, or facilities according to procedures established by the Division of Finance.

(2)  All departments, agencies, officers, and employees of the state shall give to the division the consultation and assistance that the division may reasonably request.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session

